District of Columbia statutes.
1-1001.12

Interference with registration and voting.

No one shall interfere with the registration or voting of another person, except as it may be reasonably necessary in the performance of a duty imposed by law.

History

Aug. 12, 1955, 69 Stat. 703, ch. 862, § 12

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1001.09 and § 1-1001.14.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1316.
1973 Ed., § 1-1112.